Washington statutes.
RCW 21.35.010

Security registered in beneficiary form—Ownership.

Only individuals whose registration of a security shows sole ownership by one individual or multiple ownership by two or more with right of survivorship, rather than as tenants in common, may obtain registration in beneficiary form. Multiple owners of a security registered in beneficiary form shall hold the security as joint tenants with right of survivorship either as separate property or as community property, and not as tenants in common.

[ 1993 c 287 s 2.]